Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.080

Limited authority peace officer—No additional powers.

A limited authority Washington peace officer shall have no additional powers by virtue of this chapter but shall be limited to those powers already vested by law or hereafter created by separate enactment.

[ 1985 c 89 s 8.]